Utah statutes.
35A-8-1708.   Annual report.

The division shall report annually to the Native American Legislative Liaison Committee and the governor concerning the number and type of loans and grants made as well as a list of recipients of this assistance.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

